Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any funds in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency in accordance with the provisions of Section 33-15-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026  $ 5,897,422.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the special fund in the State Treasury to the credit of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency which is comprised of special source funds collected by or otherwise available to the agency, for the support and maintenance of the agency for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.................................................. ............................................ $ 28,640,258.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for Personal Services, which includes Vacancy Funding, for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:               $  4,273,552.00 Special Funds:               $ 14,718,540.00 Total Funds:                 $ 18,992,092.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits:            $ 18,079,972.00 Progressions:                $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:             $    912,120.00 Total Personal Services:      $ 18,992,092.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   122 Time-Limited: 66 As used in this section, the term Personal Services shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits.  Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972. Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. It is the Legislatures intention that no employees salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of Personal Services based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2026 appropriation for Personal Services with the exception of escalated funds. Further, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2026 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agencys Fiscal Year 2026 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change Personal Services, the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2026 or increase the need for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, Vacancy Funding shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2026. These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2025. If the agency fills additional headcounts after May 1, 2025, until the end of Fiscal Year 2025, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally reduced to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts. The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that Vacancy Funding is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act. The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level. Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2025 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Services Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agencys total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2025 to Fiscal Year 2026, it will be the agencys discretion as to what headcounts are removed. The Legislature authorized six (6) new headcounts, which are included in the authorized headcount above for Fiscal Year 2026. One headcount will be utilized by using one FY 2025 existing headcount. New Headcount Titles Authorized: General Management  1 Geographic Information Systems - 1 Information Technology Project Manager  3 Procurement - 1 SECTION 4.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency for the purpose of defraying certain administrative expenses and the state share of the cost of disaster assistance programs, including, but not being limited to, public assistance programs, individual and family grant programs, and mitigation programs, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026........... $ 585,056.00. SECTION 5.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency Fund Nos. 33703, 3725, 3728, 372U, 3729, 37AH, 53730, 6820174300, and 58202 for the purpose of defraying certain administrative expenses and the state and federal share of the cost of disaster assistance programs, including, but not being limited to, public assistance programs, individual and family grant programs, and mitigation programs, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026................................. $ 450,755,692.00. SECTION 6.  The funds appropriated under the provisions of Sections 4 and 5 of this act are provided to defray certain administrative expenses and the state and federal share of the cost of disaster assistance programs, including public assistance programs, individual and family grant programs, and mitigation programs resulting from, but not being limited to, the following: 1604      Hurricane Katrina 4175      Severe Storms, Tornadoes, Flooding - Cities                      of Louisville & Tupelo -        Hazard Mitigation -        Other Needs Assistance -        Mississippi Temporary Housing Program -        Pre-Disaster Response -        Emergency Preparedness Programs 4429      Feb 22-March 29, 2019 Flooding 4450      Severe Weather April 13, 2019 4470      Severe Weather October 26, 2019 4478      Severe Weather January 10-11, 2020 4528      Coronavirus Pandemic 4536      Severe Weather April 12, 2020 Easter Tornadoes 4538      Flooding Feb 10-18, 2020 (Pearl River Flood) 4248      Severe Storms, Tornadoes, Flooding - North Mississippi/Holly Springs 4268      Delta Flooding 4295      Pine Belt Tornado/Flooding 4314      Severe Storms, Flooding in Adams, Calhoun,                       Carroll, Claiborne, Holmes, Jefferson, Montgomery,               Webster & Yazoo Counties 4350      Hurricane Nate 4415      Severe Storms, Flooding & Tornado in Clarke, Covington, Forrest, Greene, Jasper, Jones,                       Marion, Newton, Perry & Wayne Counties 4551      Severe Weather April 22-23, 2020 3544      Hurricane Sally 3548      Hurricane Delta 4576      Hurricane Zeta 4598      2021 Winter Storm 3582      Water Crisis EM Dec. 4697      Severe Weather March 24-25, 2023 SECTION 7.  None of the funds appropriated in Section 4 of this act shall be used to establish a special reserve fund in the State Treasury for disaster relief except as provided for in Section 33-15-307, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 8.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency may, upon the request of a local public emergency management organization in an area which has suffered a natural disaster, supply equipment to rural water associations to enable their continued operation when the local emergency management organization determines that such private entities provide services essential to the welfare of the community. SECTION 9.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency shall provide enhanced training to local governments, supervisors, mayors, civil defense groups and municipal associations in disaster management. SECTION 10.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2025.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 11.  In compliance with the "Mississippi Performance Budget and Strategic Planning Act of 1994," it is the intent of the Legislature that the funds provided herein shall be utilized in the most efficient and effective manner possible to achieve the intended mission of this agency.  Based on the funding authorized, this agency shall make every effort to attain the targeted performance measures provided below: FY2026 Performance Measures                                       Target Emergency Mgmt Preparedness Percent of the Affected Population Informed            100.00 Average Time to Deliver Goods & Services                48.00 Recovery Number of Ongoing Projects                                15 Number of Meetings Conducted                           6,000 Average Cost per Project                       20,000,000.00 Percent of Recovery Objectives Complete                100.00 Mitigation Number of Workshops Conducted                             25 Number of Ongoing Projects                                15 Average Cost per Project                           50,000.00 Percent Reduction in Damage Due to Natural and Man-Made Incidents                     5.00 A reporting of the degree to which the performance targets set above have been or are being achieved shall be provided in the agency's budget request submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for Fiscal Year 2027. SECTION 12.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Executive Director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency shall have authority to transfer not more than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) from any general or special fund treasury fund and major object budget category to another special or general fund treasury fund and major object budget category accordingly under the control of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency.  The purpose of this authority is to more efficiently use available cash reserves.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the Executive Director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency shall submit written justification for the transfer to the Legislative Budget Office and the Department of Finance and Administration on or before the fifteenth of the month prior to the effective date of the transfer. SECTION 13.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency shall submit a notification and summary of all state support funding on all disasters that require general funds or state support special funds to the Legislative Budget Office. SECTION 14.  It is the intention of the Legislature that from any funds appropriated in this act, the agency shall maintain a minimum of nine (9) Area Coordinators to provide daily assistance to local jurisdictions with emergency management activities as well as to provide quicker response to incidents and/or disasters. In addition, it is the intent of the Legislature that these Area Coordinators shall reside in or within fifty (50) miles of their assigned districts. SECTION 15.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 16.  With funds appropriated herein, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency is authorized to make reimbursement payments directly to individual Mississippi citizens who have been or will be approved to participate in the Federal Emergency Management Agency's Safe Room Grant Program.  All funds paid by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency under this program will be reimbursed to the Agency by the Federal Emergency Management Agency. SECTION 17.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2, Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) is provided from the NG911 CMRS Grant Fund as created in Senate Bill 2835, 2025 Regular Session. These funds are provided to pay for reimbursement of eligible expenses. SECTION 18.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2, Seven Hundred Forty-three Thousand Dollars ($743,000.00) is provided from the State NG911 Fund as created in Senate Bill 2835, 2025 Regular Session, for startup costs for the new State NG 911 program at the agency. SECTION 19.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds for the purpose of defraying the expenses for vehicle purchases, as authorized in Senate Bill 3040, 2024 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026. $      47,563.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2025, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 20.  The expenditure of the funds appropriated by this act shall be under the direction of the Governor and shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 21.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.